Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1215
Unlawful possession of explosive materials, first degree; exception; penalty.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person who is ineligible to obtain a permit from the Nebraska State Patrol and who possesses or stores explosive materials commits the offense of unlawful possession of explosive materials in the first degree.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not be applicable to any person transporting explosive materials in accordance with section 28-1235 or to any person who has obtained a permit from the Nebraska State Patrol to store or use such explosive materials or, in the case of a business enterprise, a permit to purchase such explosive materials.

(3) Unlawful possession of explosive materials in the first degree is a Class IV felony.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 247;

Laws 1986, LB 975, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 215, § 2.